indomorph/sin/nouns.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSNOUNSTEM

LEXICON Root
  ShortAStem;
  LongAStem;

LEXICON ShortANoun
+N+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ො #; ! -o
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ෝ #; ! -oo
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ු #; ! -u
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:න් #; ! -n
+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #; ! -wa
+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:න්ව #; ! -nwa
+N+Acc+Pl+Inanim:ුන්ව #; ! -unwa
+N+Dat+Sg:ට #; ! -ʈa
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:න්ට #; ! -nʈa
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වලට #; ! -walaʈa
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වාල්වලට #; ! -waalwalaʈa
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙඞ් #; ! -geŋ
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙන් #; ! -gen
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:ඟෙඞ #; ! -nngeŋ
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:න්ගෙන් #; ! -ngen
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ෙන් #; ! -en
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #; ! -in
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #; ! -aː : -in
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වලින් #; ! -walin
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වල්වලින් #; ! -walwalin
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ගෙ #; ! -ge
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ගේ #; ! -geː
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:ඟෙ #; ! -nnge
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:න්ගේ #; ! -ngeː
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:ේ #; ! -eː
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වල්වල #; ! -walwala
+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේ #; ! -eː
+N+Voc+Pl+Anim:නෙ #; ! -ne
+N+Voc+Pl:නේ #; ! -eː

LEXICON LongANoun
ා+N+Nom+Sg:ා #;
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ො #; ! -o
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ෝ #; ! -oo
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ු #; ! -u
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:න් #; ! -n
ා+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #; ! -wa
ා+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:න්ව #; ! -nwa
ා+N+Acc+Pl+Inanim:ුන්ව #; ! -unwa
ා+N+Dat+Sg:ාට #; ! -ʈa
ා+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:න්ට #; ! -nʈa
ා+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:ාවලට #; ! -walaʈa
ා+N+Dat+Pl+infantilism:ාවාල්වලට #; ! -waalwalaʈa
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ාගෙඞ් #; ! -geŋ
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙන් #; ! -gen
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:ාඟෙඞ #; ! -nngeŋ
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:න්ගෙන් #; ! -ngen
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:න්ගෙන් #; ! -ngeŋ
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ෙන් #; ! -en
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින #; ! -in
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #; ! -aː : -in
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:ාවලින් #; ! -walin
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:ාවල්වලින් #; ! -walwalin
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගෙ #; ! -ge
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේ #; ! -geː
ා+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:ඟෙ #; ! -nnge
ා+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:න්ගේ #; ! -ngeː
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:ේ #; ! -eː
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වල්වල #; ! -walwala
ා+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේ #; ! -eː
ා+N+Voc+Pl+Anim:නෙ #; ! -ne
ා+N+Voc+Pl:නේ #; ! -eː

LEXICON ShortAStem
අණ්වීක්ෂණය ShortANoun; ! aɳviːksaɳaja "microscopy"
අධිවර්ධය ShortANoun; ! adivardaja "accretion"
අනුතාපය ShortANoun; ! anutaːpaja "attrition;remorse;compunction"
අපවාහය ShortANoun; ! apavaːhaja "effluent"
අම්ල ShortANoun; ! amla "acids;acidity"
අවතලය ShortANoun; ! avatalaja "invagination"
අසක්නුවත්තාව ShortANoun; ! asaknuvattaːva "incompetence"
ආඥාව ShortANoun; ! aːd͡ʒɲaːva "order;authority;command;commission;bid;writ;fiat;commandment;behest;edict;prescript;rescript"
ආලෝකය ShortANoun; ! aːloːkaja "light;Light;enlightenment;torch;day light"
ඇරඹීම ShortANoun; ! ærambiːma "commencement;initialization"
ඉස්කෝප්පය ShortANoun; ! iskoːppaja "scoop;shovel;spade"
උද්‍යෝගය ShortANoun; ! ud‍joːɡaja "industry;effort;youth;enterprise;enthusiasm;zeal;ardor;diligence;perseverance;ardour;bouyancy"
උභයාර්ථතාව ShortANoun; ! ubajaːrtataːva "ambiguity"
එසෙම්බ්ලරය ShortANoun; ! esemblaraja "assembler"
කටඋත්තරය ShortANoun; ! kaʈuttaraja "deposition"
කමිසිය ShortANoun; ! kamisija "shirt"
ක්වාථය ShortANoun; ! kvaːtaja "decoction"
කාලක්‍රමය ShortANoun; ! kaːlak‍ramaja "cycle;chronology"
කුක්ෂිපටලය ShortANoun; ! kuksipaʈalaja "peritoneum"
කේතුක ShortANoun; ! keːtuka "conical;conics"
ගඟිත්ත ShortANoun; ! ɡaŋɡitta "rivulet"
ගාඩුල්‍යය ShortANoun; ! ɡaːɖul‍jaja "kyphosis"
ගෙපත ShortANoun; ! ɡepata "tenement"
චාක්‍රකෘන්තනය ShortANoun; ! t͡ʃaːk‍rakurntanaja "circumcision"
ජම්බූල ShortANoun; ! d͡ʒambuːla "violet"
ටැකියොමීටරය ShortANoun; ! ʈækijomiːʈaraja "tacheometer"
තයිමසය ShortANoun; ! tajimasaja "thymus"
තැන්පතුහල ShortANoun; ! tænpatuhala "depository"
තොල ShortANoun; ! tola "lip"
ද්විලෝහතාව ShortANoun; ! dviloːhataːva "bimetalism;bimetallism"
දිලිසුම ShortANoun; ! dilisuma "gloss"
දෙවඟන ShortANoun; ! devaŋɡana "nymph"
නඛරය ShortANoun; ! nakaraja "claw"
නැක්කිම ShortANoun; ! nækkima "napkin"
නිර්ආගමික ShortANoun; ! niraːɡamika "Irreligion"
නීචභාවය ShortANoun; ! niːt͡ʃabaːvaja "abjection;abjectness"
පටුමඟ ShortANoun; ! paʈumaŋɡa "alley"
පරාර්ථකාමය ShortANoun; ! paraːrtakaːmaja "altruism"
පලාපල ShortANoun; ! palaːpala "fortune;fruits;fortune and misfortune"
ප්‍රත්‍යවේක්ෂණය ShortANoun; ! p‍rat‍javeːksaɳaja "reflection;reflexion"
ප්‍රතිශෝෂණය ShortANoun; ! p‍ratisoːsaɳaja "absorption;resorption"
ප්‍රවේශ ShortANoun; ! p‍raveːsa "bay"
පාතලය ShortANoun; ! paːtalaja "foot"
පැහැරහැරීම ShortANoun; ! pæhærahæriːma "default"
පිළිසකරුව ShortANoun; ! piɭisakaruva "restorer"
පූජාකර්මය ShortANoun; ! puːd͡ʒaːkarmaja "ritual"
පොසිට්‍රෝනය ShortANoun; ! posiʈ‍roːnaja "positron;Positron"
බහුතාක්ෂණික ShortANoun; ! bahutaːksaɳika "polytechnic"
බීජාණුශාකය ShortANoun; ! biːd͡ʒaːɳusaːkaja "in bryophytes;sporogone;sporophyte;syncaryophyte"
භාග්‍යය ShortANoun; ! baːɡ‍jaja "luck;fortune"
මණ්ඩලමාලය ShortANoun; ! maɳɖalamaːlaja "amphitheatre"
මලයාසියාව ShortANoun; ! malajaːsijaːva "Malaysia"
මාරොස ShortANoun; ! maːrosa "rem"
මුඛ්‍යාර්ථය ShortANoun; ! muk‍jaːrtaja "keynote;denotation;primary meaning"
මෙගාචක්‍රය ShortANoun; ! meɡaːt͡ʃak‍raja "megacycle"
යාත්‍රාව ShortANoun; ! jaːt‍raːva "ship;craft;voyage;vessel"
රශ්මිය ShortANoun; ! rasmija "beam;shaft;gleam;ray;bridle;scintilla"
රූඩිය ShortANoun; ! ruːɖija "convention;usage;idiom;convention language"
ලාස්‍ය ShortANoun; ! laːs‍ja "drama;attractive"
වජ‍්‍රය ShortANoun; ! vad͡ʒa‍‍raja "diamond;adamant"
වලිප්පුව ShortANoun; ! valippuva "contortion;convulsion"
වාදවිධිය ShortANoun; ! vaːdavidija "disputation"
විකිරණශීලීතාව ShortANoun; ! vikiraɳasiːliːtaːva "Radiation"
විපරීතය ShortANoun; ! vipariːtaja "change;contrary;abnormality"
විවෘතත්වය ShortANoun; ! vivurtatvaja "glasnost"
වුවමනාව ShortANoun; ! vuvamanaːva "need;want;demand;occasion;redquirement"
ශබ්ද්‍යෝච්චාරණය ShortANoun; ! sabd‍joːt͡ʃt͡ʃaːraɳaja "pronunciation"
ශිලාශාකය ShortANoun; ! silaːsaːkaja "lithophyte"
සංඝනීභූතය ShortANoun; ! saŋganiːbuːtaja "condensate"
සකෘතිය ShortANoun; ! sakurtija "activity"
සමාචායකය ShortANoun; ! samaːt͡ʃaːjakaja "accumulator"
ස්ථෞල්‍යය ShortANoun; ! staul‍jaja "obesity"
සිඩරෝසියාව ShortANoun; ! siɖaroːsijaːva "siderosis"
සොළස ShortANoun; ! soɭasa "sixteen"
ළපටිකම ShortANoun; ! ɭapaʈikama "green;greenness"
LEXICON LongAStem
අණුකය LongANoun; ! aɳukajaː "animalcule"
අධිනීතිඥය LongANoun; ! adiniːtid͡ʒɲajaː "advocate;barrister"
අනීශ්වරවාදිය LongANoun; ! aniːsvaravaːdijaː "atheist"
අපසහායකය LongANoun; ! apasahaːjakajaː "accomplice"
අම LongANoun; ! amaː "immortal;eathless"
අල්ලන්න LongANoun; ! allannaː "catcher;arrester;arrestor"
අසන්න LongANoun; ! asannaː "listener"
ආඥාදායකය LongANoun; ! aːd͡ʒɲaːdaːjakajaː "dictator"
ආරක්ෂණවාදිය LongANoun; ! aːraksaɳavaːdijaː "protectionist"
ඇණිකරුව LongANoun; ! æɳikaruvaː "bowman"
ඇවිදිනව LongANoun; ! ævidinavaː "walk;leg;amble;slog;step up"
ඉබ්බ LongANoun; ! ibbaː "tortoise;padlock"
උණහපුළුව LongANoun; ! uɳahapuɭuvaː "lemur"
උපාසකය LongANoun; ! upaːsakajaː "devotee"
එපෙන්ඩයිම LongANoun; ! epenɖajimaː "ependyma"
ඕටව LongANoun; ! oːʈavaː "Ottawa"
කඩාගන්නව LongANoun; ! kaɖaːɡannavaː "snap"
කරන්න LongANoun; ! karannaː "doer"
කවුඩ LongANoun; ! kavuɖaː "crow;bee eater;drongo"
කාදිනල්තුම LongANoun; ! kaːdinaltumaː "cardinal"
කැපොත්ත LongANoun; ! kæpottaː "cockroach"
කිරිදරුව LongANoun; ! kiridaruvaː "nursling;suckling"
කුරුමිට්ට LongANoun; ! kurumiʈʈaː "dwarf"
කෙකරගානව LongANoun; ! kekaraɡaːnavaː "cackle"
කොබෙයිය LongANoun; ! kobejijaː "dove;columba;turtle dove;white pigeon;wood pigeon"
ගනුදෙනුකරුව LongANoun; ! ɡanudenukaruvaː "customer"
ගාන්ධර්වය LongANoun; ! ɡaːndarvajaː "musician"
ගුඩ්ඩ LongANoun; ! ɡuɖɖaː "idiot;mutt;stupid person"
ගොළුව LongANoun; ! ɡoɭuvaː "dummy;mute;dumb person"
චීන LongANoun; ! t͡ʃiːnaː "a chinese;china man;chinese"
ජාරය LongANoun; ! d͡ʒaːrajaː "male paramour;paramour"
ඩාඩ LongANoun; ! ɖaːɖaː "dada"
තරගකරුව LongANoun; ! taraɡakaruvaː "contestant;contester"
තාරකාවේදිය LongANoun; ! taːrakaːveːdijaː "Astronomer"
තුලනීක්ෂිතය LongANoun; ! tulaniːksitajaː "assessee"
දලඹුව LongANoun; ! dalambuvaː "caterpillar"
දිගඅරිනව LongANoun; ! diɡarinavaː "spread"
දුෂ්ටය LongANoun; ! dusʈajaː "snake;villain;ruffian;felon;reprobate;bad lot"
දෛවඥය LongANoun; ! daivad͡ʒɲajaː "astrologer;astrologist;fortune teller"
නඩුකියන්න LongANoun; ! naɖukijannaː "litigant"
නළියනව LongANoun; ! naɭijanavaː "quiver;wriggle"
නෑන LongANoun; ! næːnaː "cousin;sister in law"
නියැළෙනව LongANoun; ! nijæɭenavaː "strain;toil"
නිෂ්ප්‍රභ LongANoun; ! nisp‍rabaː "null"
පක්ෂිය LongANoun; ! paksijaː "bird;fowl"
පන්තලෝන LongANoun; ! pantaloːnaː "pantaloon"
පරිවාරකය LongANoun; ! parivaːrakajaː "attendant;attache"
ප්‍රජාතන්ත්‍රවාදිය LongANoun; ! p‍rad͡ʒaːtant‍ravaːdijaː "democrat"
ප්‍රධානිය LongANoun; ! p‍radaːnijaː "head;principal;chief;boss;chieftain;chieftan;headman;mogul;pakka sahib;supremo"
ප්‍රියවයස්‍යය LongANoun; ! p‍rijavajas‍jajaː "crony"
පැංච LongANoun; ! pæŋt͡ʃaː "child;chap;grub;puppy;bairn;brat;laddie;little man;urchin"
පිටිසරය LongANoun; ! piʈisarajaː "clown;hind;rustic;countryman;yokel;boor;bumpkin;churl;clod hopper;clod ploe;hilly billy;oaf"
පුලින්දය LongANoun; ! pulindajaː "barbarian;vedda"
පොලිස්කාරය LongANoun; ! poliskaːrajaː "policeman;copper;peeler"
බලුමැක්‍ක LongANoun; ! balumæk‍kaː "flea"
බුරනව LongANoun; ! buranavaː "bay;bark;bawl;yap"
මගිය LongANoun; ! maɡijaː "traveler;traveller;itinerant"
මසුර LongANoun; ! masuraː "cheap skate;churl;curmudgeon;jew;miser;niggard"
මිණිතඥය LongANoun; ! miɳitad͡ʒɲajaː "surveyor"
මෛථූනිකය LongANoun; ! maituːnikajaː "fornicator"
යොරූබ LongANoun; ! joruːbaː "Yoruba"
රිකෙට්සිය LongANoun; ! rikeʈsijaː "rickettsia"
ලෙවීවරය LongANoun; ! leviːvarajaː "Levite"
වර්ගය LongANoun; ! varɡajaː "nation;race"
වැඩිමල LongANoun; ! væɖimalaː "elder"
වියන්න LongANoun; ! vijannaː "weaver"
වෛද්‍යවරය LongANoun; ! vaid‍javarajaː "doctor;physician;Physician"
ශෝන LongANoun; ! soːnaː "Shona"
සන්ධිභේදකය LongANoun; ! sandibeːdakajaː "burglar"
සහායකය LongANoun; ! sahaːjakajaː "help;friend;assistant;companion;associate;attendant;supporter;adjuvant;coadjutor;complice;help mate;helpmeet"
සැවුළ LongANoun; ! sævuɭaː "cock"
සුවඳතල LongANoun; ! suvandatalaː "mint"
හඹනව LongANoun; ! hambanavaː "shape;chase;mould;drive away"
හෝතඹය LongANoun; ! hoːtambajaː "mongoose"
